Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-7405
Subject of abuse; prohibited acts.

An insurer shall not engage in an unfairly discriminatory act or practice against a subject of abuse.

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 18.